North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06 Operators’ Licenses
39-06-14.1.
Motorcycle operator’s licenses and motorized bicycles.

A resident of this state who is at least fourteen years of age may apply to the director for a class M learner’s permit. An individual holding a class M learner’s permit for the operation of a motorcycle may not operate the motorcycle during the hours when the use of headlights are required under section 39-21-01 or carry or transport any passenger. Any learner’s permit may be renewed or a new permit issued for an additional period.

An individual with a class M license may operate any motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding motorized bicycles and tractors.

The holder of a class A, B, C, or D license may receive a class M endorsement upon successful completion of an examination. The director may waive the skill portion of the examination if the applicant has successfully completed a motorcycle safety course approved by the director.

An applicant sixteen years of age and older, who does not hold a current valid operator’s license, may be issued a class M learner’s permit after successful completion of a written examination. The class M license must be issued after the applicant has successfully completed a driver’s examination. The director may waive the skill portion of the examination if the applicant has successfully completed a motorcycle safety course approved by the director.

Applicants fourteen or fifteen years of age may be issued a motorcycle learner’s permit if the applicant is enrolled in or has completed an approved motorcycle safety course. Applicants for a motorcycle operator’s license who are under sixteen years of age must hold an initial learner’s permit for at least two months before applying for a class M operator’s license, must have completed an approved motorcycle safety course, and must hold a valid motorcycle learner’s permit at the time of application. The director may waive the skill portion of the examination if the applicant has successfully completed a motorcycle safety course approved by the director. Any person under sixteen years of age who holds a permit or license may not operate a motorcycle powered with an engine in excess of five hundred ten cubic centimeters displacement. Evidence that the applicant has satisfactorily completed a motorcycle safety course which meets the minimum requirements of the motorcycle safety foundation must accompany the application.

The director may issue a motorized bicycle operator’s permit to an applicant who is at least fourteen years of age. To obtain a permit, the applicant shall pay a fee as listed in section 39-06-49 and take a written examination of the applicant’s knowledge of traffic laws and general rules of the road. If the applicant passes the written examination and the director is satisfied that the applicant has adequate eyesight, the director may issue the applicant a motorized bicycle operator’s permit, even if the applicant does not have an operator’s license. The permit expires in the same manner as an operator’s license. A person who has an operator’s license, a temporary permit, an instruction permit, or a motorcycle permit is not required to obtain a motorized bicycle operator’s permit.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 23; 2019, ch. 316, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-06-14.2.
Driver license central identity management.

The director shall provide central identity management for all state agencies for citizens who possess a nondriver photo identification card or driver’s license utilizing driver record data.

The director will provide access for identity verification. The director may not allow entities to transfer or collect identification data from the driver’s license database, but shall create processes and procedures that enable verification of data without direct release of the data, except as authorized in chapter 39-33.

The director shall develop procedures to comply with this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 256, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06-14.3.
Electronic operator’s license.

The department shall implement a computerized licensing system that allows a licensed motor vehicle operator to provide electronic proof of valid licensing on an electronic communications device.

The electronic proof of valid licensing may be used:

When being stopped by a law enforcement officer for the purpose of enforcing or investigating the possible violation of an ordinance or state law; or

For identification purposes.

The electronic operator’s license must be designed so that there is no need for the credential holder to relinquish possession of the device in which the electronic credential system is installed in order to present the credential, or for the individual to whom the credential is presented to access the verification system to confirm the validity of the credential.

The computerized licensing system may not transmit or transfer any information contained on an electronic operator’s license without authorization from the licensed motor vehicle operator.

In case of a discrepancy between a physical and electronic credential, the electronic credential takes priority and is considered to provide the current information.

The electronic credential and verification systems must be designed to protect the credential holder’s privacy, including the use of privacy enhancing technology or other appropriate methods. If the department enters an agreement with a third-party electronic credential system provider, the agreement must require the third-party electronic credential system provider to take appropriate measures to protect the credential holder’s privacy.

In addition to the fees required by section 39-06-49 for an operator’s license, a substitute operator’s license, and an operator’s license renewal:

An initial fee of five dollars is required from a licensed motor vehicle operator seeking to possess an electronic operator’s license; and

The fee for an electronic operator’s license renewal is five dollars.

The director may adopt rules necessary for the effective implementation of an electronic operator’s licensing system.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 288, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

39-06-15.
Commissioner may appoint agents to issue licenses — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 21.

39-06-16.
License to be carried and exhibited on demand.

An individual licensed to operate a motor vehicle shall have a physical or electronic operator’s license in the individual’s immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall physically surrender or electronically provide an operator’s license, upon demand of any court, police officer, or a field deputy or inspector of the department. However, an individual charged with violating this section may not be convicted or assessed any court costs if the individual produces within fourteen days to the office of the prosecutor where the matter is pending, a valid operator’s license issued to that individual that is not under suspension, revocation, or cancellation at the time of the individual’s arrest.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0616; S.L. 1961, ch. 258, § 1; 1969, ch. 340, § 3; 1981, ch. 320, § 93; 1991, ch. 326, § 150; 2003, ch. 315, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 24; 2021, ch. 283, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 288, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 39-06-16 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 288, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1072; and Section 4 of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502.

39-06-17.
Restricted licenses — Penalty for violation.

Upon issuing an operator’s license or a temporary restricted operator’s license under section 39-06.1-11, the director may impose restrictions suitable to a licensee’s driving ability with respect to the type of motor vehicle, special mechanical control devices required on a motor vehicle that the licensee may operate, or any other restrictions applicable to the licensee as the director may determine to be appropriate to assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the licensee. The director may either issue a special restricted class D license or may state the restrictions upon the usual license form. In the same manner, the director shall restrict licenses under section 39-16.1-09.

The director may issue a restricted class D license to operate the parent’s, guardian’s, grandparent’s, sibling’s, aunt’s, or uncle’s automobile to a minor, who is at least fifteen years of age, and otherwise qualified, upon the written recommendation of the parent or guardian. A minor may operate a motor vehicle that is not the parent’s or guardian’s to take the actual ability test. The parent, guardian, grandparent, sibling, aunt, or uncle at all times is responsible for any and all damages growing out of the negligent operation of a motor vehicle by a minor. A restricted class D license may not be issued to a minor unless the minor, accompanied by the parent or guardian, appears in person and satisfies the director that:

The minor is at least fifteen years of age;

The minor is qualified to operate an automobile safely;

It is necessary for the child to drive the parent’s, guardian’s, grandparent’s, sibling’s, aunt’s, or uncle’s automobile without being accompanied by an adult;

The minor has successfully completed an approved driver’s education course that includes a course of classroom instruction and a course of behind-the-wheel instruction acceptable to the director or has successfully completed a course at an approved commercial driver training school; and

The minor has accumulated a minimum of fifty hours of supervised, behind-the-wheel driving experience in various driving conditions and situations that include night driving; driving on gravel, dirt, or aggregate surface road; driving in both rural and urban conditions; and winter driving conditions.

The provisions of subsection 2 do not authorize a minor to drive a commercial truck, motorbus, or taxicab except the holder of a restricted class D license may drive a farm motor vehicle having a gross weight of fifty thousand pounds [22679.62 kilograms] while used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from a farm when so operated within one hundred fifty miles [241.40 kilometers] of the driver’s farm.

A minor with a restricted class D license issued under subsection 2 may operate the type or class of motor vehicle specified on the restricted license under the following conditions:

A restricted licenseholder must be in possession of the license while operating the motor vehicle.

An individual holding a restricted class D license driving a motor vehicle may not carry more passengers than the vehicle manufacturer’s suggested passenger capacity.

An individual holding a restricted class D license driving a motor vehicle may not operate an electronic communication device to talk, compose, read, or send an electronic message while operating a motor vehicle that is in motion unless the sole purpose of operating the device is to obtain emergency assistance, to prevent a crime about to be committed, or in the reasonable belief that an individual’s life or safety is in danger.

An individual holding a restricted class D license may not operate a motor vehicle between the later of sunset or nine p.m. and five a.m. unless a parent, legal guardian, or an individual eighteen years of age or older is in the front seat of the motor vehicle or the motor vehicle is being driven directly to or from work, an official school activity, or a religious activity.

Upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions of a license, the director may suspend or revoke the license but the licensee is entitled to a hearing as upon a suspension or revocation under this chapter.

It is a class B misdemeanor for an individual to operate a motor vehicle in any manner in violation of the restrictions imposed under this section except for the restrictions in subsection 4.

If a temporary restricted license is issued under section 39-06.1-11 and the underlying suspension was imposed for a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, or is governed by chapter 39-20, punishment is as provided in subsection 2 of section 39-06-42. Upon receiving notice of the conviction the director shall revoke, without opportunity for hearing, the licensee’s temporary restricted license and shall extend the underlying suspension for a like period of not more than one year.

If the conviction referred to in this section is reversed by an appellate court, the director shall restore the individual to the status held by the individual before the conviction, including restoration of driving privileges if appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0617; S.L. 1969, ch. 340, § 4; 1973, ch. 297, § 1; 1973, ch. 298, § 1; 1973, ch. 301, § 19; 1975, ch. 106, § 429; 1975, ch. 339, § 4; 1983, ch. 415, § 5; 1987, ch. 458, § 7; 1989, ch. 461, § 2; 1991, ch. 411, § 1; 1999, ch. 341, § 2; 2007, ch. 324, § 1; 2011, ch. 276, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 25; 2013, ch. 292, § 1.

39-06-18.
Substitute operator’s license.

If an operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card issued under this chapter is lost, mutilated, or destroyed, or contains erroneous information due to a change in name, address, or for any other reason, the individual to whom the operator’s license or identification card was issued may obtain a substitute, by providing documentation that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity, date of birth, and legal presence of the applicant and provide a social security card or other satisfactory evidence of a social security number and proof of residence address, if not previously completed or if there are changes to the information already on file, and upon payment of a fee listed in section 39-06-49.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0618; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 4; 1981, ch. 384, § 4; 1987, ch. 440, § 5; 1997, ch. 332, § 5; 2013, ch. 291, § 26; 2017, ch. 256, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06-19.
Expiration of license — Renewal.

Every operator's license issued under this chapter or chapter 39-06.2 expires and is renewed according to this section.

The expiration date of a noncommercial operator's license for an individual whose birth occurred in a year ending in an odd numeral is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the third subsequent year ending in an odd numeral, except for an individual who, at the time of renewal, is seventy-eight years of age or older is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the second subsequent year ending in an odd numeral. The expiration date of a noncommercial operator's license for an individual whose birth occurred in a year ending in an even numeral is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the third subsequent year ending in an even numeral, except for an individual who, at the time of renewal, is seventy-eight years of age or older is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the second subsequent year ending in an even numeral.

The expiration date of a commercial operator's license for an individual whose birth occurred in a year ending in an odd numeral is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the second subsequent year ending in an odd numeral. The expiration date of a commercial operator's license for an individual whose birth occurred in a year ending in an even numeral is twelve midnight on the anniversary of the birthday in the second subsequent year ending in an even numeral.

An individual who has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into the United States, a pending application for asylum in the United States, a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States, approved deferred action status, or a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence or conditional permanent residence status in the United States will be issued a temporary operator's license or nondriver photo identification card. The temporary operator's license or identification card is valid only during the period of time of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States or, if there is no definite end to the period of authorized stay, a period of one year. The license or card may be renewed only upon presentation of valid documentary evidence that the status has been extended.

An applicant for renewal must present the application with the fee for renewal of license to the director not before ten months prior to the expiration date of the operator's license. The director may require an examination of an applicant as upon an original application. The director may require an applicant for renewal or a substitute to provide documentation that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity, date of birth, and legal presence of the applicant and provide a social security card or other satisfactory evidence of a social security number and proof of residence address, if not previously completed or if there are changes to the information already on file. The director may not issue a distinguishing number that is, contains, can be converted to, or is an encrypted version of the applicant's social security number.

The director may not renew an operator's license if the license has been suspended under section 14-08.1-07. Upon the recommendation of the court, the director may issue a temporary permit to the licensee under section 39-06.1-11 if the temporary permit is necessary for the licensee to work and the court has determined the licensee is making a good-faith effort to comply with the child support order

An applicant for renewal of an operator's license must provide a certificate of examination from the driver licensing or examining authorities or a statement as to the corrected and uncorrected vision of the applicant from a licensed physician or an optometrist, except as required under subsection 9. The director shall provide visual examination equipment at each location where a license may be renewed.

An individual submitting an application and the fee for renewal of license one year or more after the expiration of a license, except an applicant whose military service has terminated less than thirty days prior to the application, must be treated as an initial applicant.

A noncommercial applicant may apply by mail or electronically for renewal of a license during every other renewal cycle, except as otherwise provided by subsection 10. The director may use vision information provided by the applicant to meet vision requirements for applicants under seventy years of age and adopt procedures necessary to implement this subsection.

A noncommercial applicant for an operator's license may not renew by mail or electronically if the applicant is seeking a new photo or changes to the information on the face of the physical operator's license.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0619; S.L. 1963, ch. 278, § 3; 1967, ch. 292, § 5; 1969, ch. 341, § 1; 1975, ch. 334, § 1; 1981, ch. 384, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 73; 1983, ch. 429, § 3; 1985, ch. 428, § 1; 1987, ch. 440, § 6; 1987, ch. 457, § 3; 1995, ch. 154, § 2; 1999, ch. 339, § 3; 2001, ch. 37, § 5; 2007, ch. 323, § 2; 2009, ch. 328, § 2; 2009, ch. 329, § 4; 2011, ch. 274, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 27; 2017, ch. 256, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 264, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 289, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 39-06-19 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 289, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1102; and Section 2 of Chapter 287, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1168.

Section 39-06-19 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 264, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1299; and Section 7 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1128.

Decisions under Prior Law

Incomplete Application for Renewal of License.

N.D.C.C. § 39-06-19(3) did not relieve an applicant of the duty of providing a social security number on his application; therefore, the driver did not present the North Dakota Department of Transportation with a complete application for renewal of his driver’s license containing his social security number, and did not demonstrate a clear legal right to performance of the act sought to be compelled by his petition for a writ of mandamus. Kouba v. Hoeven, 2004 ND 185, 687 N.W.2d 491, 2004 N.D. LEXIS 312 (N.D. 2004).

39-06-19.1.
Extended term of license held by members of the armed forces — Limitations.

A valid operator’s license issued under this chapter to a resident of this state who enters or is in the United States armed forces and serving on active duty continues in full force and effect so long as the active service continues and the licensee remains absent from this state, and for not to exceed thirty days following the date on which the holder of this license is honorably separated from this service or returns to this state, unless the license is sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause. The license is valid only if in the immediate possession of the licensee while driving and the licensee has the licensee’s discharge or separation papers, if the licensee has been discharged or separated from the service, or has documentation authorizing the licensee to be absent from the licensee’s duty station in the licensee’s immediate possession.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 299, § 1; 1975, ch. 339, § 5; 2013, ch. 291, § 28.

Cross-References.

Exemption of license requirements for members of armed forces stationed in state, see § 39-06-02.

39-06-19.2.
Renewal of license held by out-of-state individual.

The director may renew an operator’s license issued to an individual who is a resident of this state or to a spouse who is a resident of this state, if the individual or spouse is out of state as a result of the employment of the individual or the other spouse with a governmental entity or a business organization, including the United States armed forces or foreign service. The director shall develop procedures and requirements for a renewal under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 293, § 1.

39-06-20.
Notice of change of address or name.

If an individual after applying for or receiving an operator’s license or identification card moves from the address named on the license or identification card, or if the name is changed by marriage or otherwise, that individual within ten days after moving or the name change shall notify the director in writing or in person of that individual’s old and new addresses or of the individual’s former and new names and of the number of any operator’s license or identification card then held by that person. An individual may obtain a corrected operator’s license or identification card for address only changes, but must obtain a new operator’s license or identification card for a name change, by making an application as provided for in section 39-06-18. The department may change the address based on information received from any authorized address correction service of the United States postal service. The department may also develop procedures for receiving notification of address changes by electronic means.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0620; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 5; 1979, ch. 416, § 1; 1993, ch. 375, § 4; 1997, ch. 332, § 6; 2001, ch. 340, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 29; 2017, ch. 256, § 8, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06-21.
Filing application records.

The director shall file and maintain each application for a license with suitable indexes containing:

All applications denied and on each denied application note the reason for the denial;

All applications granted; and

The name of every licensee whose operator’s license has been suspended, revoked, canceled, or restricted by the department and after each name state the reasons for such actions.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 20; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0621; S.L. 1977, ch. 347, § 1; 1979, ch. 416, § 2; 1991, ch. 394, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 30.

39-06-22.
Driving records of licensees.

The director shall file all accident reports and abstracts of court records of convictions received by the director under the laws of this state and maintain convenient records or make suitable notations in order that each record of each licensee showing the convictions of the licensee and the traffic accidents in which the licensee has been involved is readily ascertainable and available for the consideration of the director.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0622; S.L. 1977, ch. 347, § 2; 1991, ch. 394, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 31.

39-06-23.
Definition of suspension, revocation, and cancellation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 62.

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. § 39-01-01.

39-06-24.
Authority to cancel licenses.

The director shall cancel any operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card upon determining that the individual is not entitled to the issuance of the document or that the individual failed to give the required or correct information on the application or the fee was invalid. Invalid fees include being in the form of an insufficient fund or no-account check or a credit or debit card in which the transaction was canceled by the applicant before the department received correct payment. The making of a false statement in any application for an operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card, concerning the applicant’s age or the prior loss of driving privileges through a cancellation, suspension, revocation, or similar sanction in any state, is grounds for the director to cancel any document or privilege issued on the basis of the application.

Upon cancellation, the holder shall surrender the nondriver photo identification card to the director or any police officer may take custody of the card.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 23; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0624; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 7; 1973, ch. 300, § 1; 1987, ch. 458, § 8; 2005, ch. 329, § 2; 2011, ch. 271, § 9; 2013, ch. 291, § 32.

39-06-25.
Suspending privileges of nonresidents.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the highways of this state given to a nonresident is subject to suspension or revocation by the director in like manner and for like cause as an operator’s license issued in this title may be suspended or revoked.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 24; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0625; 2013, ch. 291, § 33.

39-06-26.
Reporting convictions, suspensions, or revocations of nonresidents.

Upon receiving a record of the conviction or adjudication in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws of this state, or an equivalent ordinance, the director may notify the licensing authority in the state in which the nonresident resides or is licensed.

If a nonresident’s operating privilege is suspended or revoked under the law of this state, the director shall notify the licensing authority in the state in which the nonresident resides or is licensed.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 25; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0626; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 6; 1979, ch. 416, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 34.

39-06-27.
Suspending licenses upon conviction, suspension, or revocation in another jurisdiction.

The director may suspend or revoke the operator’s license of any resident of this state or the privilege of a nonresident to operate a motor vehicle in this state upon receiving notice of the conviction of that individual in a tribal court or in another state of an offense, which if committed in this state would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of an operator’s license of an operator. The director may act on a report of a conviction in tribal court received from any tribal law enforcement agency. This section may not be construed as authorizing the assessment of points against a resident’s driving record in accordance with chapter 39-06.1, except upon conviction of a resident driver for a criminal offense in a tribal court or in another state which is equivalent to one of those offenses defined in section 39-06.1-05. A suspension or revocation may not be imposed for convictions for driving under suspension or revocation on an Indian reservation or in another state if a valid operator’s license from this state was in effect at the time of the violation. For purposes of this section, originals, photostatic copies, and electronic transmissions of the records of the driver’s licensing or other authority of the other jurisdiction are sufficient evidence even if not certified copies.

Upon receipt of a certification that the operating privileges of a resident of this state have been suspended or revoked on an Indian reservation or in any other state under a law providing for the suspension or revocation for failure to deposit security for the payment of judgments arising out of a motor vehicle accident if under circumstances that would require the director to suspend a nonresident’s operating privileges had the accident occurred in this state, the director shall suspend the license of the resident if the resident was the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident. The suspension continues until the resident furnishes evidence satisfactory to the director of the resident’s compliance with the laws of the Indian reservation or the other state relating to the deposit of security or payment of a judgment arising out of a motor vehicle accident, to the extent that compliance would be required if the accident had occurred in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 26; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0627; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 7; 1975, ch. 339, § 6; 1977, ch. 348, § 1; 1981, ch. 385, § 1; 1995, ch. 372, § 2; 1999, ch. 340, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 35.

39-06-28.
Courts to forward license to director upon certain convictions.

If an individual is convicted of any offense for which this chapter requires the revocation of the operator’s license of that individual by the director, the court of the conviction shall require the surrender to the court of any operator’s license then held by the convicted individual. The court shall then forward the operator’s license and a record of the conviction to the director.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 27; 1957, ch. 261, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0628; 2013, ch. 291, § 36.

Cross-References.

Negligent homicide, see § 12.1-16-03.

39-06-29.
Courts to report records of certain convictions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 386, § 3.

39-06-29.1.
Authority to suspend licenses of juveniles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 39.

39-06-30.
Conviction — Meaning and effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 62.

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. 39-01-01.

39-06-31.
Revocation of licenses.

A period of revocation is at least thirty days and not more than one year, unless otherwise provided by law.

The director shall revoke for a period of one year or for a period as may be recommended by the trial court, the operator’s license of an individual upon receiving a record of the individual’s conviction of any of the following offenses:

A felony in which a motor vehicle was used in the commission of the felony.

A misdemeanor resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle and causing serious bodily injury, as defined in section 12.1-01-04, to another individual.

The making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the director under this chapter or under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles.

The revocation of the license under this section may be beyond any time of imprisonment or court-ordered addiction treatment.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 30; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0631; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 10; 1973, ch. 301, § 20; 1979, ch. 405, § 6; 1983, ch. 415, § 7; 1987, ch. 460, § 1; 1993, ch. 382, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 37.

Cross-References.

Negligent homicide, see § 12.1-16-03.

Temporary restricted license prohibited during period of revocation under this section, see § 39-06.1-11.

39-06-32.
Authority to suspend licenses.

The director may suspend the operator’s license of an individual, after hearing, upon proof by a fair preponderance of the evidence, that any of the following apply to the licensee:

Commission of an offense for which mandatory revocation of license is required upon conviction.

Incompetence to drive a motor vehicle.

Unlawful or fraudulent use of an operator’s license.

Refusal to submit to an implied consent chemical test on an Indian reservation or in another state. For purposes of this subsection, the specific requirements for establishing a refusal used on the Indian reservation or in the other state may not be considered, and photostatic copies of the records of the other jurisdiction’s driver’s licensing authority are sufficient evidence of the refusal whether those copies are certified. The suspension must be for the same length of time as the revocation in section 39-20-04. If the refusal arose out of an arrest or stop of an individual while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the period of suspension must be the same as the period of revocation provided in section 39-06.2-10.

Failure, as shown by the certificate of the court, to pay a fine or serve any other sentence as ordered by a court upon conviction for any criminal traffic offense.

Failure, as shown by the certificate of the court, to appear in court or post and forfeit bond after signing a promise to appear, if signing is required by law, in violation of section 39-06.1-04, willful violation of a written promise to appear in court, in violation of section 39-07-08, or violation of equivalent ordinances or laws in another jurisdiction. Upon resolution by the operator of the underlying cause for a suspension under this subsection, as shown by the certificate of the court, the director shall record the suspension separately on the driving record. This separate record is not available to the public.

An administrative decision on an Indian reservation or in another state that the licensee’s privilege to drive on that Indian reservation or in that state is suspended or revoked because of a violation of that Indian reservation’s or state’s law forbidding motor vehicle operation with an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, or because of a violation of that Indian reservation’s or state’s law forbidding the driving or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least four one-hundredths of one percent by weight. The specific requirements for establishing the violation on the Indian reservation or in the other state may not be considered and certified copies of the records of the Indian reservation’s or other state’s driver’s licensing authority are sufficient evidence of the violation. The suspension must be for the same duration as the suspension in section 39-20-04.1, if the violation does not involve a commercial motor vehicle. If the violation involves a commercial motor vehicle, the period of suspension must be the same as the period of suspension provided in section 39-06.2-10. For purposes of this section, originals, photostatic copies, or electronic transmissions of the records of the driver’s licensing or other authority of the other jurisdiction are sufficient evidence whether they are certified copies.

Conviction of an offense under this title and it appears from the director’s records that the offense contributed to causing an accident which resulted in death or serious personal injury or serious property damage. A suspension may not be imposed if the individual has been sanctioned for the same offense under section 39-06-31.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 31; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0632; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 11; 1969, ch. 340, § 6; 1973, ch. 301, § 21; 1977, ch. 349, § 1; 1981, ch. 385, § 2; 1985, ch. 429, § 1; 1987, ch. 458, §§ 9, 10; 1989, ch. 461, § 3; 1991, ch. 394, § 4; 1991, ch. 412, § 1; 1993, ch. 383, § 1; 1995, ch. 372, § 3; 1997, ch. 334, § 1; 1999, ch. 340, § 5; 2001, ch. 340, § 3; 2003, ch. 312, § 2; 2003, ch. 316, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 38.

Cross-References.

Unlawful use of license, see § 39-06-40.

39-06-32.1.
Suspension of child’s driving privileges.

Upon receipt of a copy of an order of a juvenile court ordering the suspension of a child operator’s license, the director shall suspend the operator’s license and make notation of the length of time of the suspension. During the time of the suspension, an application for a class D instruction permit may not be accepted from the child. For purposes of this section, “child” is defined by section 27-20.4-02.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 19; 2013, ch. 291, § 39; 2021, ch. 245, § 33, effective July 1, 2021.